dev/apertium-tt-kk.kk.twol
Alphabet 

А а Ә ә Б б В в Г г Ғ ғ Д д Е е Ё ё Ж ж З з И и Й й К к Қ қ
Л л М м Н н Ң ң О о Ө ө П п Р р С с Т т У у Ұ ұ Ү ү Ф ф Һ һ Х х Ц ц Ч ч Ш ш
Щ щ ъ Ы ы І і ь Э э Ю ю Я я 

%>:0

%{а%}:а %{ы%}:ы %{ғ%}:ғ %{м%}:м %{д%}:д %{н%}:н

;

Sets

Cns = б в г ғ д ж з к қ л м н ң п р с т ф һ х ц ч ш щ 
      Б В Г Ғ Д Ж З К Қ Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Һ Х Ц Ч Ш Щ ;

Vow = ө ү е і о ұ а ы я ә 
      Ө Ү Е І О Ұ А Ы Я Ә ;

FrontVow = ө ү е і Ө Ү Е І;
FrontRoundedVow = ө ү Ө Ү;
FrontUnroundedVow = е і Е І;
BackVow = о ұ а ы я ю О Ұ А Ы Я Ә Ю;
ArchiVow = %{а%} %{ы%} ;
ArchiCns = %{ғ%} %{м%} %{д%} %{н%};
BackRoundedVow = о ұ ;
BackUnroundedVow = а ы я А Ы Я ;
MidVow = ә Ә;
VoicedCns = б д г ғ в ж з Б Д Г Ғ В Ж З ;
VoicelessCns = п т к қ ф ш с щ х һ П Т К Қ Ф Ш С Щ Х Һ;
SonorantCns = м н ң л р М Н Ң Л Р;
DevoiceOnly = д ж з Д Ж З;
VoiceDevoice = б г ғ п к қ ф х һ Б Г Ғ П К Қ Ф Х Һ;
NotVoicelessCns = VoicedCns SonorantCns ;
NonFront = Cns  BackVow ArchiVow ArchiCns %> ;
NonBack =  Cns FrontVow ArchiVow ArchiCns %> ;
NonBackRounded = Cns FrontVow BackUnroundedVow ArchiVow ;
NonFrontUnrounded = Cns BackVow ;
NotVow = Cns ArchiCns %> ;

Rules

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Short Back {a} Harmony"
%{а%}:е <=> FrontVow: NonBack:* %>: NonBack:* _ ;

! мектеп>д{а}
! мектеп>де

"Short Back {ы} Harmony"
%{ы%}:і <=> FrontVow: NonBack:* %>: NonBack:* _ ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! Devoicing involves the change of a voiced consonant to its voiceless 
! counterpart when it comes in contact with an affix beginning with a 
! voiceless consonant, e.g. жагу 'to burn' > жақтыру 'to cause to 
! burn', қасқалдақ Fulcia atra (Eurasian coot) < қаз 'goose' + қалдақ. 

"Consonant devoicing in C-final stems before vowel suffix"
Cx:Cy <=> _ %>: Vow  ;
          where Cx in (п к)
                Cy in (б ғ) matched ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! When suffixes with the initial consonants л-, б-, м-, н-, д- are added to 
! stems with a final consonant, the initial consonant of the suffix is 
! assimilated to the stem final consonant. For example, after voiceless 
! consonants (-п, -т, -с, -к, -қ) the plural suffix +лар / +лер changes 
! to +тар / +тер

"Sonorant л assimilation to д after voiced consonants"
л:д <=> [ ж | з | л | м | н | ң ] %>: _ %{а%}: р ;

! құрал>лар
! құрал>дар

"Sonorant л assimilation to т after voiceless consonants"
л:т <=> [ п | т | с | к | қ ] %>: _ %{а%}: р ;

! жұрт>лар
! жұрт>тар

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! /n/ surfaces as [n] after vowels; after voiced consonants it surfaces 
! as [d], after unvoiced, [t] EXCEPT:
! after nasals (m, n, ŋ), when there's a following nasal coda in the same 
! syllable but across a SINGLE morphemic boundary, the /n/ surfaces as [n]

"Realisation of {н} after voiced consonant"
%{н%}:д <=> VoicedCns %>: _ ;

"Realisation of {н} after voiceless consonant"
%{н%}:т <=> VoicelessCns %>: _ ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! /m/ surfaces as [m] after vowels and consonants of higher sonority than 
! nasals (й, у, р, л); after nasals and obstruents it surfaces as [d], after 
! unvoiced, [t] after nasals (m, n, ŋ), when there's a following nasal coda 
! in the same syllable but across a SINGLE morphemic boundary, 
! the /m/ surfaces as [m]

! /d/ surfaces as [n] in the same nasal harmony environment


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Consonant ғ to қ assimilation in dative"
%{ғ%}:қ <=> BackVow: NonFront:* [ б | в | г | ғ | д | к | қ | һ | п | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ ] %>: _ %{а%}: ;

! даңқ>{ғ}{а}
! даңқ>қ{а}

"Consonant ғ to к assimilation in dative"
%{ғ%}:к <=> FrontVow: NonBack:* [ б | в | г | ғ | д | к | қ | һ | п | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ ] %>: _ %{а%}: ;

! мектеп>{ғ}{а}
! мектеп>к{а}

"Consonant ғ to г assimilation in dative"
%{ғ%}:г <=> FrontVow: NonBack:* [ ж | з | й | л | м | н | ң | р | у ] %>: _ %{а%}: ;

! мектеп>л{а}р>{ғ}{а}
! мектеп>л{а}р>г{а}

"Consonant ғ to қ assimilation in comparative"
%{ғ%}:қ <=> BackVow: NonFront:* [ б | в | г | ғ | д | к | қ | һ | п | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ | ю ] %>: %{ы%}: р %{а%}: _ ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Consonant д to т assimilation in locative"
%{д%}:т <=> [ б | в | г | ғ | д | к | қ | һ | п | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ ] %>: _ %{а%}: ;

! мектеп>{д}{а}
! мектеп>т{а}

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Possessive с deletion after consonant"
с:0 <=> NotVow: %>: _ ;
